Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6799YH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2410 Section 1. DECLARATION OF INDEPENDENCE ââ CAPITOL ROTUNDA 1 MONUMENT. 2 1. The department of administrative services, in 3 consultation with the capitol planning commission, shall 4 authorize the placement of a monument based on the painting 5 âDeclaration of Independenceâ by John Trumbull in the rotunda 6 of the capitol building subject to the requirements of this 7 section. 8 2. The department of administrative services shall solicit 9 and approve an application for the construction of a monument 10 based on the painting âDeclaration of Independenceâ by John 11 Trumbull. An application for the construction of the monument 12 must specify the design concept for the monument, provide an 13 estimated total cost for the monument, identify planned sources 14 of funding for construction and maintenance of the monument, 15 provide a proposed timeline for the project, and include such 16 other information as the department requires. If more than one 17 application is submitted, the department, in consultation with 18 the capitol planning commission, shall approve the application 19 that can best meet the requirements for construction and 20 maintenance of the monument. 21